Wisconsin, session 2025, AB690.
do enact as follows:AB690,13Section 1. 66.0145 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB690,1,4466.0145 (title) No preferences discrimination in hiring or contracting.AB690,25Section 2. 66.0145 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB690,2,3666.0145 (2) Unless required to secure federal aid, no political subdivision may 1discriminate against, or grant preferential treatment on the basis of, race, color, 2ancestry, national origin, or sexual orientation in making employment decisions 3regarding employees of a political subdivision or contracting for public works.AB690,2,44